Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 7 Miscellaneous Provisions

47-23-120.
No abridgement of rights under predecessor retirement provisions.

This chapter shall not deny or abridge any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled under a predecessor retirement system on June 30, 1998, and the board of trustees is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this chapter. All other persons who become members shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-120

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1.

47-23-121.
Exemption from levy and sale, garnishment or attachment.

The return of contributions, any optional benefit, or any other right accrued or accruing to any person under this chapter and the moneys in the fund created by this chapter are exempt from levy and sale, garnishment, attachment, or any other process whatsoever and shall not be assignable, except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-121

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1.

47-23-122.
Falsification of records; correction of errors; participation in Employees’ Retirement System or Superior Court Judges Retirement Fund.

Any person who knowingly makes any false statements or falsifies or permits to be falsified any record or records of the retirement system in an attempt to defraud the retirement system as a result of such an act shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $500.00, imprisonment not to exceed 12 months, or both.

If any change or error in the records results in any member or beneficiary receiving from the fund more or less than he or she would have been entitled to receive had the records been correct, the board shall have the power to correct such error and to adjust the payments, as far as practicable, in such a manner that the actuarial equivalent of the benefit to which such member or beneficiary was correctly entitled shall be paid.

No member of this retirement system shall be eligible to make contributions to the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia or to the Superior Court Judges Retirement Fund of Georgia created by Chapter 8 of this title nor shall any such member be eligible for appointment as senior judge pursuant to Chapter 8 of this title.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-122

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1.

47-23-123.
Participation in Superior Court Judges Retirement Fund, District Attorneys Emeritus, and District Attorneys Retirement Fund.

No member of this retirement system shall be eligible to participate in the Superior Court Judges Retirement Fund of Georgia created by Chapter 8 of this title or the District Attorneys Emeritus and the District Attorneys Retirement Fund of Georgia created by Chapter 12 of this title.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-123

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1.

47-23-124.
Legislative intent.

It is the intention of the General Assembly that except as is expressly provided in an Act approved April 2, 1998 (Ga. L. 1998, p. 513), creating this retirement system, the benefits and conditions precedent to receiving benefits as provided by this chapter shall apply to all covered positions equally, and no legislation shall be enacted modifying or repealing any provision of this chapter which would create a contrary result.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-124

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 20, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 64/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, deleted a comma following “an Act” near the beginning.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 67, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of an irreconcilable conflict between a provision of Sections 62 through 64 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2010 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over this Act to the extent of the conflict.”